Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-316
Rules and regulations.

The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to insure the integrity, security, and authenticity of electronic notarizations in accordance with the Electronic Notary Public Act. Such rules and regulations shall include procedures for the approval of electronic notary solution providers by the Secretary of State. In addition, the Secretary of State may require an electronic notary public to create and to maintain a record, journal, or entry of each electronic notarial act.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 16.